csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_C.yaml
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: giwaabamisiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: giwaabamisiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: niwaabamigosiinaanig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: niwaabamigosiinaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: niwaabamigoosiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Excl: niwaabamigomin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Excl: niwaabamigomin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: giwaabamimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: giwaabamimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: niwaabamigonaanig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: niwaabamigonaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: niwaabamigoomin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Excl: niwaabamigosiiminaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Excl: niwaabamigosiiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: giwaabamisiiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: giwaabamisiiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: niwaabamigonaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: niwaabamigosiinaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: niwaabamigoosiiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Excl: niwaabamigominaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Excl: niwaabamigominaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: giwaabamiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: giwaabamiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: niwaabamigosiinaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: niwaabamigonaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: niwaabamigoominaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Incl: giwaabamigosiiminaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Incl: giwaabamigosiiminaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: giwaabamigosiinaadogenag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: giwaabamigosiinaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: giwaabamigoosiiminaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Incl: giwaabamigominaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Incl: giwaabamigominaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: giwaabamigonaadogenag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: giwaabamigonaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: giwaabamigoominaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Incl: giwaabamigosiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Incl: giwaabamigosiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: giwaabamigosiinaanig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: giwaabamigosiinaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: giwaabamigoosiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Incl: giwaabamigomin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Incl: giwaabamigomin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: giwaabamigonaanig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: giwaabamigonaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: giwaabamigoomin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Incl: giwaabamigosiiminaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Incl: giwaabamigosiiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: giwaabamigosiinaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: giwaabamigosiinaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: giwaabamigoosiiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Incl: giwaabamigominaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Incl: giwaabamigominaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: giwaabamigonaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: giwaabamigonaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: giwaabamigoominaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: waabamigosiiwaanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: waabamigowaanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: waabamisiiwegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: waabamiwegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: waabamisiiwanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: waabamiwanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: waabamisiiwaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: waabamiwaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: waabamisiigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: waabamigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: waabamigoosiiwaanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: waabamigoowaanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: waabamigosiwaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: waabamigoyaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: waabamisiweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: waabamiyeg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: waabamisiwan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: waabamiyan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: waabamisigwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: waabamiwaad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: waabamisig
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: waabamid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: waabamigoosiwaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: waabamigooyaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: waabamigosiwaambaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: waabamigoyaambaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: waabamisiwegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: waabamiyegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: waabamisiwamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: waabamiyamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: waabamisigwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: waabamiwaapan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: waabamisigoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: waabamipan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: waabamigoosiwaambaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: waabamigooyaambaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: waabamigosiiwegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: waabamigowegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: waabamisinowagoogwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: waabaminagoogwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: waabamigoosiiwegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: waabamigoowegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: waabamigoosiiwanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: waabamigoowanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: waabamisiinogwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: waabaminogwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: waabamigoosiiwegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: waabamigoowegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: waabamigosiweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: waabamigoyeg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: waabamisinowagog
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: waabaminagog
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: waabamisinowegwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: waabaminegwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: waabamisinoweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: waabamineg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: waabamigosiweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: waabamigooyeg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: waabamigoosiweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: waabamigooyeg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: waabamigosiwegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: waabamigoyegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: waabamisinowagoogoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: waabaminagoogoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: waabamigoosiwegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: waabamigooyegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: waabamigoosiwamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: waabamigooyamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: waabamisinokwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: waabamikwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: waabamigoosiwegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: waabamigooyegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: waabamigosiiwanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: waabamigowanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: waabamisiinowaanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: waabaminowaanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: waabamisiinowegwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: waabaminowegwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: waabamisiinowegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: waabaminowegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: waabamisiinogwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: waabaminogwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: waabamigoosiiwanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: waabamigoowanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: waabamigosiwan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: waabamigoyan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: waabamisinowaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: waabaminaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: waabamisinokwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: waabamikwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: waabamisinok
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: waabamik
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: waabamigoosiwan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: waabamigooyan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: waabamigoosiwan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: waabamigooyan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: waabamigosiwamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: waabamigoyamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: waabamisinowaambaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: waabaminaambaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: waabamisinowegwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: waabaminegwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: waabamisinowegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: waabaminegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: waabamisinokiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: waabamikiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: waabamigoosiwamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: waabamigooyamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: waabamigosiiwaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: waabamigowaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: [waabamaasiwaawagwaawen,waabamaasiiwagwaawen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: waabamaawagwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: [waabamaasiwaawegwaawen,waabamaasiiwegwaawen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: waabamaawegwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: [waabamaasiwaawadwaawen,waabamaasiiwadwaawen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: waabamaawadwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: waabamigosiiwaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: waabamigowaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: [waabamaasiwaawangidwaawen,waabamaasiiwangidwaawen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: waabamaawangidwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: [waabamaasiwaawangwaawen,waabamaasiiwangwaawen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: waabamaawangwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: [waabamaasiwaawindwaawen,waabamaasiiwintwaawen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: waabamaawindwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: waabamigosigwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: waabamigowaad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: waabamaasiwagwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: waabamagwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: waabamaasiwegwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: waabamegwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: waabamaasiwadwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: waabamadwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: waabamigosigwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: waabamigowaad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: waabamaasiwangidwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: waabamangidwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: waabamaasiwangwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: waabamangwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: waabamaasiwindwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: waabamindwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: waabamigosigwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: waabamigowaapan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: waabamaasiwagwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: waabamagwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: waabamaasiwegwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: waabamegwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: waabamaasiwadwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: waabamadwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: waabamigosigwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: waabamigowaapan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: waabamaasiwangidwaaban
